Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1104
Members; removal; procedure.

Members of the State Highway Commission may be removed by the Governor for inefficiency, neglect of duty, or misconduct in office, but only after delivering to the member a copy of the charges and affording him an opportunity of being publicly heard in person or by counsel in his own defense, upon not less than ten days' notice. Such hearing shall be held before the Governor. If such member shall be removed, the Governor shall file in the office of the Secretary of State a complete statement of all the charges made against such member and the findings of the Governor thereon, together with a complete record of the proceedings.

Laws 1953, c. 334, § 4, p. 1096.